Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-503 Name of debtor and secured
party. (a) A financing statement sufficiently provides the name of the
debtor:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), if
the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a trust
that is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the
name that is stated to be the registered organization's name on the public
organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the registered
organization's jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend, or
restate the registered organization's name;

(2) Subject to subsection (f), if the collateral is
being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only if the
financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the name of the
decedent and, in a separate part of the financing statement, indicates that the
collateral is being administered by a personal representative;

(3) If the collateral is held in a trust that is not
a registered organization, only if the financing statement:

(A) Provides, as the name of the debtor:

(i) If the organic record of the trust
specifies a name for the trust, the name specified; or

(ii) If the organic record of the trust does
not specify a name for the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and

(B) In a separate part of the financing
statement:

(i) If the name is provided in accordance with
subparagraph (A)(i), indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or

(ii) If the name is provided in accordance with
subparagraph (A)(ii), provides additional information sufficient to distinguish
the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or the same
testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust, unless the
additional information so indicates;

(4) Subject to subsection (g), if the debtor is an
individual to whom this State has issued a driver's license or non-driver
identification card that has not expired, only if the financing statement
provides the name of the individual that is indicated on the driver's license
or non-driver identification card;

(5) If the debtor is an individual to whom paragraph
(4) does not apply, only if the financing statement provides the individual
name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor; and

(6) In other cases:

(A) If the debtor has a name, only if the
financing statement provides the organizational name of the debtor; and

(B) If the debtor does not have a name, only
if it provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or other persons
comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient
if the person named were the debtor.

(b) A financing statement that provides the
name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a) is not rendered
ineffective by the absence of:

(1) A trade name or other name of the debtor; or

(2) Unless required under subsection (a)(6)(B), names
of partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor.

(c) A financing statement that provides only
the debtor's trade name does not sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.

(d) Failure to indicate the representative
capacity of a secured party or representative of a secured party does not
affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.

(e) A financing statement may provide the name
of more than one debtor and the name of more than one secured party.

(f) The name of the decedent indicated on the
order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by the
court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the "name
of the decedent" under subsection (a)(2).

(g) If this State has issued to an individual
more than one driver's license or non-driver identification card of a kind
described in subsection (a)(4), the one that was issued most recently is the
one to which subsection (a)(4) refers.

(h) In this section, the "name of the
settlor or testator" means:

(1) If the settlor is a registered organization, the
name that is stated to be the settlor's name on the public organic record filed
most recently with or issued or enacted by the settlor's jurisdiction of
organization that purports to state, amend, or restate the settlor's name; or

(2) In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator
indicated in the trust's organic record. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1; am L 2012, c
33, §12]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next